Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB557.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1921 of Title 1 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1921. Legislative intent controls.* * *(d) Deference.--(1) If words of a statute are not explicit, the following shall apply:(i) T he ambiguity of the statute may not be interpreted as an implicit delegation to a Commonwealth department, agency, board or commission of legislative rulemaking authority.(ii) The ambiguity of the statute may not be used as justification for any of the following:(A) Interpreting the authority of a Commonwealth 12345678910111213141516171819 department, agency, board or commission expansively.(B) Deferring to the interpretation of a Commonwealth department, agency, board or commission on the question of law.(2) This subsection shall apply to the judicial review of an action by a Commonwealth department, agency, board or commission under the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0557PN0584 - 2 - 12345678